test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex_uaddid_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - uáđđiđ: # MLO, checked
    uáđđiđ+V+Inf: uáđđiđ
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: uáđám
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: uáđáh
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: uáđá
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: uáđđeen
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: uáđivettee
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: uáđđiv
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: uáđđip
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: uáđivetteđ
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: uáđih
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: oođđim
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: oođđih
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: oođij
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: oođijm
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: oođijd
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: oođijn
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: oođijm
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: oođijd
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: ođđii
    uáđđiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: uáđáččim
    uáđđiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: uáđáččih
    uáđđiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: uáđáččij
    uáđđiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: uáđáččáim
    uáđđiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: uáđáččáid
    uáđđiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: uáđáččáin
    uáđđiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: uáđáččijm
    uáđđiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: uáđáččijd
    uáđđiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: uáđáččii
    uáđđiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: uáđeem
    uáđđiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: uáđeeh
    uáđđiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: oođiš
    uáđđiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: ođižeen
    uáđđiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: oođišvettee
    uáđđiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: ođižává
    uáđđiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: ođižep
    uáđđiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: oođišvetteđ
    uáđđiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: ođižeh
    uáđđiđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: [uáđi, uáđe]
    uáđđiđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: uáđus
    uáđđiđ+V+Imprt+Du1: uáđđoon
    uáđđiđ+V+Imprt+Du2: uáđđee
    uáđđiđ+V+Imprt+Du3: uáđđus
    uáđđiđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: uáđđup
    uáđđiđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: uáđđiđ
    uáđđiđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: uáđđus
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: [uáđi, uáđe]
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: uáđđám
    uáđđiđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: uáđáččii
    uáđđiđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: uáđáá
    uáđđiđ+V+PrsPrc: uáđđee
    uáđđiđ+V+PrfPrc: uáđđám
    uáđđiđ+V+Actio+Nom: uáđđim
    uáđđiđ+V+Actio+Ess: uáđimin
    uáđđiđ+V+Actio+Loc: uáđimist
    uáđđiđ+V+Actio+Ill: uáđimân
    uáđđiđ+V+Actio+Com: uáđidijn
    uáđđiđ+V+VAbess: [uáđihánnáá, uáđehánnáá]
